Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.410

State support for students at institutions of higher education—Information.

The education data center in consultation with institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 shall annually develop information on the approximate amount of state support that students receive. For students at state-supported colleges and universities, the information must include the approximate level of support received by students in each tuition category. That information may include consideration of the following: Expenditures included in the educational cost formula; revenue forgiven from waived tuition and fees; state-funded financial aid awarded to students at public institutions; and all or a portion of appropriated amounts not reflected in the educational cost formula for institutional programs and services that may affect or enhance the educational experience of students at a particular institution. For students attending a private college, university, or proprietary school, the information shall include the amount of state-funded financial aid awarded to students attending the institution.

[ 2012 c 229 s 301.]